Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 21 Credit Life and Disability Insurance

Cross references. —

For provisions as to consumer credit insurance generally, see §§

40-14-401

through

40-14-453

.

Chapter inapplicable to insurance for terms of five years orlonger. —

As this chapter, by the terms of §

26-21-101

, does not apply to the sale of credit insurance for terms of five years or longer, rates and forms for such insurance cannot be approved under this chapter. Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

This chapter and art. 4 of ch. 14 of title 40 provide for separate and distinct insurance schemes,

and the provisions of this chapter and of article 4, which relates to consumer credit insurance, cannot be properly combined nor can selective provisions from each be merged into an insurance scheme different from either. Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Uniform Consumer Credit Code,” 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 663 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance § 522; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1312, 1313.

Requiring borrower to pay for insurance as condition of loan as usury, 91 ALR2d 1344.

Initiation and termination of coverage under group credit life or disability insurance, 5 ALR3d 962.

Credit life insurer's punitive damage liability for refusing payment, 55 ALR4th 246.

Construction of incontestable clause applicable to disability insurance, 67 ALR5th 513.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 8.

§ 26-21-101.
Scope and applicability of chapter.

All life insurance and all disability insurance in connection with loans or other credit transactions is subject to this chapter, except that insurance is not subject to this chapter if:

It is in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of more than ten (10) years; or

The issuance of that insurance is an isolated transaction by the insurer not related to an agreement or a plan or regular course of conduct for insuring debtors of the creditor.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-440; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 440; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1989, ch. 135, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This section does not prohibit sale of credit insurance for terms of five years or longer,

but rather provides that such insurance is not subject to this chapter. Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Applied

in

Kirkwood v. CUNA Mut. Ins. Soc'y, 937 P.2d 206,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 26-21-102.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Credit life insurance” means insurance on the life of a debtor pursuant to or in connection with a specific loan or other credit transaction;

“Credit disability insurance” means insurance on a debtor to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is disabled as defined in the policy;

“Creditor” means the lender of money or vendor of goods, services or property, including a lessor under a lease intended as a security, rights or privileges, for which payment is arranged through a credit transaction, or any successor to the right, title or interest of any such lender or vendor, and an affiliate, associate or subsidiary of any of them or any director, officer or employee of any of them or any other person in any way associated with any of them;

“Debtor” means a borrower of money or a purchaser or lessee of goods, services, property, rights or privileges for which payment is arranged through a credit transaction;

“Indebtedness” means the total amount payable by a debtor to a creditor in connection with a loan or other credit transaction.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-441; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 441; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-21-103.
Forms of credit life and credit disability insurance.

Credit life insurance and credit disability insurance shall be issued only in the following forms:

Individual policies of life insurance issued to debtors on the term plan;

Individual policies of disability insurance issued to debtors on a term plan, or disability benefit provisions in individual policies of credit life insurance;

Group policies of life insurance issued to creditors providing insurance upon the lives of debtors on the term plan;

Group policies of disability insurance issued to creditors on a term plan insuring debtors, or disability benefit provisions in group credit life insurance policies to provide disability coverage.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-442; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 442; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-21-104.
Amount of credit life insurance.

The initial amount of credit life insurance shall not exceed the total amount repayable under the contract of indebtedness.

If an indebtedness is repayable in substantially equal installments, the amount of insurance shall not exceed the scheduled or actual amount of unpaid indebtedness, whichever is greater.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, insurance on agricultural credit transactions not exceeding two (2) years in duration may be written up to the amount of the loan commitment on a nondecreasing or level term plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, insurance on educational credit transaction commitments may be written for the amount of the portion of that commitment that the creditor has not advanced.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-443; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 443; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Applied

in

Kirkwood v. CUNA Mut. Ins. Soc'y, 937 P.2d 206,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 26-21-105.
Credit disability insurance.

The total amount of indemnity payable by credit disability insurance in case of disability, as defined in the policy, shall not exceed the aggregate of the periodic scheduled unpaid installments of the indebtedness, and the amount of each periodic indemnity payment shall not exceed the original indebtedness divided by the number of periodic installments.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-443; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 443; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-106.
Term of insurance.

The term of any credit life insurance or credit disability insurance, subject to the insurer’s acceptance, commences on the date when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor, or the date when the debtor applies for the insurance, whichever is later, except that if a group policy provides coverage with respect to the existing obligations, the insurance on a debtor with respect to the indebtedness commences on the effective date of the policy.

If evidence of insurability is required and that evidence is furnished more than thirty (30) days after the date when the debtor becomes obligated to the creditor, the term of the insurance may commence on the date on which the insurer determines the evidence to be satisfactory, and in that case there shall be an appropriate refund or adjustment of any charge to the debtor for insurance. The term of the insurance shall not extend more than fifteen (15) days beyond the scheduled maturity date of the indebtedness except when extended without additional cost to the debtor.

If the indebtedness is discharged because of renewal or refinancing prior to the scheduled maturity date, the insurance in force shall be terminated before any new insurance may be issued in connection with the renewed or refinanced indebtedness.

In all cases of termination prior to scheduled maturity, a refund shall be paid or credited as provided in W.S.

26-21-109

.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-444; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 444; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-107.
Provisions of policies and certificates; disclosure to debtors.

All credit life insurance and credit disability insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy, or in the case of group insurance by a certificate of insurance, which individual policy or group certificate shall be delivered to the debtor.

Each individual policy or group certificate of credit life insurance or credit disability insurance, or both, in addition to other requirements of law, shall:

Set forth:

The insurer’s name and home office address;

The identity by name or otherwise of the persons insured;

The premium amount of payment, if any, by the debtor separately for credit life insurance and credit disability insurance;

A description of the amount, term and coverage including any exceptions, limitations and restrictions; and

State that the benefits shall be paid to the creditor to reduce or extinguish the unpaid indebtedness and, if the amount of insurance exceeds the unpaid indebtedness, the excess is payable to a beneficiary, other than the creditor, named by the debtor or to his estate.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the individual policy or group certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the insured debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred.

If a debtor makes a separate payment for credit life or credit disability insurance and an individual policy or group certificate of insurance is not delivered to the debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred, a copy of the application for the policy or a notice of proposed insurance shall be delivered at that time to the debtor. The copy of the application for, or notice of proposed insurance, shall:

Be signed by the debtor and shall set forth:

The identity by name or otherwise of the person or persons insured;

The premium or amount of payment by the debtor, if any, separately for credit life insurance and credit disability insurance; and

A statement that within thirty (30) days, if the insurer accepts the insurance, there shall be delivered to the debtor an individual policy or group certificate of insurance containing:

The insurer’s name and home office address;

A description of the amount, term and coverage including any exceptions, limitations and restrictions.

Refer exclusively to insurance coverage and shall be separate from the loan, sale or other credit statement of account, instrument or agreement, unless the information required by this subsection is prominently set forth in the copy of the application or the notice of proposed insurance.

Upon the insurer’s acceptance of the insurance and within thirty (30) days from the date the indebtedness is incurred, the insurer shall cause the individual policy or group certificate of insurance to be delivered to the debtor. The application or notice of proposed insurance shall state that upon the insurer’s acceptance, the insurance is effective as provided in W.S.

26-21-106

.

If the named insurer does not accept the risk, the debtor shall receive a policy or certificate of insurance setting forth the name and home office address of the substituted insurer and the amount of the premium to be charged. If the amount of premium is less than that set forth in the notice of proposed insurance, an appropriate refund shall be made.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-445; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 445; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Ambiguity of required policy provisions. —

Where language of a certificate of insurance was required by this section, the provisions were deemed valid and consistent with public policy, contrary to the insureds' contention that the language was ambiguous. Kirkwood v. CUNA Mut. Ins. Soc'y, 937 P.2d 206,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1997).

Stated

in

Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 26-21-108.
Filing of policies with commissioner; approval or disapproval; withdrawal of approval.

All policies, certificates of insurance, notices of proposed insurance, applications for insurance, endorsements and riders delivered or issued for delivery in this state and the schedule of premium rates pertaining thereto shall be filed with the commissioner.

The commissioner, within thirty (30) days after the filing of any such policies, certificates of insurance, notices of proposed insurance, applications for insurance, endorsements and riders, shall disapprove any such form if the premium rates charged or to be charged are excessive in relation to benefits, or if it contains provisions which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, deceptive or encourage misrepresentation of the coverage, or are contrary to any provision of this code [title 26] or of any rule or regulation promulgated under this code. In determining whether to disapprove any form the commissioner shall consider past and prospective loss experience within and outside this state, underwriting practice and judgment to the extent appropriate and any other relevant factors within and outside this state.

If the commissioner notifies the insurer that the form is disapproved, it is unlawful for the insurer to issue or use that form. The commissioner shall specify in the notice the reason for his disapproval and state that a hearing will be granted within twenty (20) days after request in writing by the insurer. No policy, certificate of insurance, notice of proposed insurance, application, endorsement or rider shall be issued or used until the expiration of thirty (30) days after it is filed, unless the commissioner gives his prior written approval thereto.

The commissioner, at any time after a hearing held not less than twenty (20) days after written notice to the insurer, may withdraw his approval of any form on any ground set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The written notice of hearing shall state the reason for the proposed withdrawal.

The insurer shall not issue or use any form after the effective date of withdrawal.

If a group policy of credit life insurance or credit disability insurance is delivered in another state, the insurer shall file only the group certificate and notice of proposed insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state as specified in W.S. 26-21-107(b) and (d). The commissioner shall approve the forms if they conform with the requirements specified in W.S. 26-21-107(b) and (d) and if the schedules of premium rates applicable to the insurance evidenced by the certificate or notice are not in excess of the insurer’s schedules of premium rates filed with the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-446; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 446; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to commissioner's hearings generally, see §§

26-2-125

through

26-2-129

.

§ 26-21-109.
Schedules of premiums; refunds.

Any insurer may revise its schedules of premium rates and shall file the revised schedules with the commissioner. No insurer shall issue any credit life insurance or credit disability insurance policy for which the premium rate exceeds that determined by the insurer’s schedules then on file with the commissioner.

Each individual policy or group certificate shall provide that if the insurance is terminated prior to the scheduled maturity date of the indebtedness, any refund of an amount paid by the debtor for insurance shall be paid or credited promptly to the person entitled thereto. The commissioner shall prescribe a minimum refund and no refund less than the minimum need be made. The formula to be used in computing the refund shall be filed with and approved by the commissioner.

If a creditor requires a debtor to make any payment for credit life insurance or credit disability insurance and an individual policy or group certificate of insurance is not issued, the creditor shall immediately give written notice to the debtor and shall promptly make an appropriate credit to the account.

The amount charged to a debtor for any credit life or credit disability insurance shall not exceed the premiums charged by the insurer, as computed at the time the charge to the debtor is determined.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, §§ 8, 9; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-447; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 447; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-110.
Collection of premiums.

The insurance premium or other identifiable charge for credit life or credit disability insurance may be collected from the insured or included in the principal of any loan or other transaction at the time the transaction is completed. If included in the principal of the loan or other transaction, a statement that the premium is included in the principal and the amount of the premium shall be legible on the face of the policy or certificate in a size larger than the type used in the body of the policy or certificate.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-448; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 448; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-111.
Premium not deemed interest; gains to creditor not violation.

The premium or cost of credit life or credit disability insurance when issued through any creditor is not deemed interest or charges, or consideration or an amount in excess of permitted charges in connection with the loan or other credit transaction. Any gain or advantage to the creditor arising out of the premium or commission or dividend from the issuance of the insurance is not a violation of any other law of this state.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-449; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 449; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-112.
Issuance and delivery of policies.

All credit life insurance and credit disability insurance policies shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state only by an insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state and shall be issued only through holders of licenses or authorizations issued by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-450; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 450; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-113.
Claims.

All claims shall be:

Promptly reported to the insurer or its designated claim representative, and the insurer shall maintain adequate claim files;

Settled as soon as possible and in accordance with the terms of the insurance contract;

Paid either by draft drawn upon the insurer or by check of the insurer to the order of the claimant to whom payment of the claim is due pursuant to the policy provisions, or upon direction of the claimant to one specified.

No plan or arrangement shall be used whereby any person other than the insurer or its designated claim representative is authorized to settle or adjust claims. The creditor shall not be designated as claim representative for the insurer in adjusting claims, except that a group policyholder, by arrangement with the group insurer, may draw drafts or checks in payment of claims due to the group policyholder subject to the insurer’s audit and review.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-451; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 451; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-112

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-21-114.
Choice of debtor to use existing insurance or new insurance for additional security.

If credit life insurance or credit disability insurance is required as additional security for any indebtedness, the debtor, upon request to the creditor, has the option of furnishing the required amount of insurance through existing insurance policies which he owns or controls or of procuring and furnishing the required coverage through any insurer authorized to transact insurance within this state.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 138, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-452; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 452; W.S. 1977, §

26-21-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.